Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-310
State colleges; students; admission.

The board shall make such rules and regulations for the admission of students to the state colleges as may seem to be best for the interest of the state colleges and not inconsistent with the purpose for which they have been established.

Laws 1881, c. 78, sub. XIII, § 16, p. 376;

Laws 1907, c. 127, § 1, p. 423;

Laws 1911, c. 121, § 1, p. 423;

R.S.1913, § 7073;

C.S.1922, § 6708;

C.S.1929, § 85-317;

Laws 1937, c. 212, § 6, p. 850;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 85-317;

R.S.1943, § 85-310;

Laws 1969, c. 852, § 8, p. 3202.

Board cannot arbitrarily refuse admission to or continuance in normal school. Jackson v. State ex rel. Majors, 57 Neb. 183, 77 N.W. 662 (1898).